Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201881-1201.20
Department; adopt rules and regulations.

The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out sections 81-1201.01 to 81-1201.20.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 20;

Laws 2017, LB217, § 33.